Illinois, session 104th, SB3697.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 62605-51 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-51)8    Sec. 2605-51. Division of the Academy and Training.9    (a) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 10exercise, but not be limited to, the following functions:11        (1) Oversee and operate the Illinois State Police 12    Training Academy.13        (2) Train and prepare new officers for a career in law 14    enforcement, with innovative, quality training and 15    educational practices.16        (3) Offer continuing training and educational programs 17    for Illinois State Police employees.18        (4) Oversee the Illinois State Police's recruitment 19    initiatives.20        (5) Oversee and operate the Illinois State Police's 21    quartermaster.22        (6) Duties assigned to the Illinois State Police in 23    Article 5, Chapter 11 of the Illinois Vehicle Code   SB3697 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    concerning testing and training officers on the detection 2    of impaired driving.3        (7) Duties assigned to the Illinois State Police in 4    Article 108B of the Code of Criminal Procedure. 5    (a-5) Successful completion of the Illinois State Police 6Academy satisfies the minimum standards pursuant to 7subsections (a), (b), and (d) of Section 7 of the Illinois 8Police Training Act and exempts Illinois State Police officers 9from the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board's 10State Comprehensive Examination and Equivalency Examination. 11Satisfactory completion shall be evidenced by a commission or 12certificate issued to the officer. 13    (b) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 14exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested in the former 15Division of State Troopers by Section 17 of the Illinois State 16Police Act.17    (c) Specialized training. The Division of the Academy and 18Training shall provide the following specialized training: 19        (1) Crash reconstruction specialist; training. The 20    Division of the Academy and Training shall cooperate with 21    the Division of Forensic Services to provide specialized 22    training in crash reconstruction for Illinois State Police 23    officers. Only Illinois State Police officers who 24    successfully complete the training may be assigned as 25    crash reconstruction specialists.26        (2) Death and homicide investigations; training. The   SB3697 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    Division of the Academy and Training shall provide 2    training in death and homicide investigation for Illinois 3    State Police officers. Only Illinois State Police officers 4    who successfully complete the training may be assigned as 5    lead investigators in death and homicide investigations. 6    Satisfactory completion of the training shall be evidenced 7    by a certificate issued to the officer by the Division of 8    the Academy and Training. The Director shall develop a 9    process for waiver applications for officers whose prior 10    training and experience as homicide investigators may 11    qualify them for a waiver. The Director may issue a 12    waiver, at his or her discretion, based solely on the 13    prior training and experience of an officer as a homicide 14    investigator.15            (A) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 16        require all homicide investigator training to include 17        instruction on victim-centered, trauma-informed 18        investigation. This training must be implemented by 19        July 1, 2023.20            (B) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 21        cooperate with the Division of Criminal Investigation 22        to develop a model curriculum on victim-centered, 23        trauma-informed investigation. This curriculum must be 24        implemented by July 1, 2023. 25        (3) Investigation of officer-involved criminal sexual 26    assault; training. The Division of the Academy and   SB3697 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    Training shall cooperate with the Division of Criminal 2    Investigation to provide a specialized criminal sexual 3    assault and sexual abuse investigation training program 4    for Illinois State Police officers. Only Illinois State 5    Police officers who successfully complete the training may 6    be assigned as investigators in officer-involved criminal 7    sexual assault investigations under Section 10 of the Law 8    Enforcement Criminal Sexual Assault Investigation Act. 9        (4) Investigation of officer-involved deaths; 10    training. The Division of the Academy and Training shall 11    have a written policy regarding the investigation of 12    officer-involved deaths that involve a law enforcement 13    officer employed by the Illinois State Police as required 14    under Section 1-10 of the Police and Community Relations 15    Improvement Act and shall provide specialized training in 16    that policy for Illinois State Police officers. 17        (5) Juvenile specialist; training. The Division of the 18    Academy and Training shall provide specialized juvenile 19    training for Illinois State Police officers who meet the 20    definition of "juvenile police officer" as defined under 21    paragraph (17) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 22    1987. Juvenile specialists may complete questioning of 23    juveniles on school grounds as provided under Section 24    22-88 of the School Code. 25        (6) Peer support program; training. The Division of 26    the Academy and Training shall cooperate with the Office   SB3697 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    of the Director to provide peer support advisors with 2    appropriate specialized training in counseling to conduct 3    peer support counseling sessions under Section 10 of the 4    First Responders Suicide Prevention Act. 5        (7) Police dog training standards; training. All 6    police dogs used by the Illinois State Police for drug 7    enforcement purposes pursuant to the Cannabis Control Act, 8    the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, and the 9    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act shall 10    be trained by programs that meet the certification 11    requirements set by the Director or the Director's 12    designee. Satisfactory completion of the training shall be 13    evidenced by a certificate issued by the Division of the 14    Academy and Training.15        (8) Safe2Help; training. The Division of the Academy 16    and Training shall cooperate with the Division of Criminal 17    Investigation to ensure all program personnel or call 18    center staff, or both, are appropriately trained in the 19    areas described in subsection (f) of Section 10 of the 20    Student Confidential Reporting Act. (10)21    (c-5) In-service training.22        (1) At least once, the Division of the Academy and 23    Training shall develop and require the following 24    in-service training opportunities to be completed by 25    Illinois State Police officers:26            (A) Cell phone medical information; training.   SB3697 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1        Training required under this subparagraph (A) shall 2        provide instruction on accessing and using medical 3        information stored in cell phones. The Division may 4        use the program approved under Section 2310-711 of the 5        Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of 6        the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to develop 7        the Division's program.8            (B) Autism spectrum disorders; training. Training 9        required under this subparagraph (B) shall instruct 10        Illinois State Police officers on the nature of autism 11        spectrum disorders and in identifying and 12        appropriately responding to individuals with autism 13        spectrum disorders. The Illinois State Police shall 14        review the training curriculum and may consult with 15        the Department of Public Health or the Department of 16        Human Services to update the training curriculum as 17        needed.18        (2) At least every year, the Division of the Academy 19    and Training shall provide the following in-service 20    training to Illinois State Police officers:21            (A) Cultural diversity; training.22                (i) Training required under this subparagraph 23            (A) shall provide training and continuing 24            education to Illinois State Police officers 25            concerning cultural diversity, including topics 26            such as sensitivity toward racial and ethnic   SB3697 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1            differences.2                (ii) This training and continuing education 3            shall, among other things, emphasize that the 4            primary purpose of enforcement of the Illinois 5            Vehicle Code is safety and equal, uniform, and 6            non-discriminatory enforcement of the law.7            (B) Minimum annual in-service training 8        requirements. Minimum annual in-service training 9        includes:10                (i) crisis intervention training;11                (ii) emergency medical response training and 12            certification;13                (iii) firearm qualification training;14                (iv) law updates; and15                (v) officer wellness and mental health.16            (C) Firearms restraining orders; training. 17        Training required under this subparagraph (C) shall 18        provide instruction on the processes used to file a 19        firearms restraining order, to identify situations in 20        which a firearms restraining order is appropriate, and 21        to safely promote the usage of the firearms 22        restraining order in different situations.23        (3) At least every 3 years, the Division of the 24    Academy and Training shall provide the following 25    in-service training to Illinois State Police officers:26            (A) Arrest and use of force and control tactics;   SB3697 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1        training. Training required under this subparagraph 2        (A) shall provide to Illinois State Police officers 3        training and continuing education concerning knowledge 4        of policies and laws regulating the use of force; 5        shall equip officers with tactics and skills, 6        including de-escalation techniques, to prevent or 7        reduce the need to use force or, when force must be 8        used, to use force that is objectively reasonable, 9        necessary, and proportional under the totality of the 10        circumstances; and shall ensure appropriate 11        supervision and accountability. The training shall 12        consist of at least 30 hours and shall include:13                (i) at least 12 hours of hands-on, 14            scenario-based role-playing;15                (ii) at least 6 hours of instruction on use of 16            force techniques, including the use of 17            de-escalation techniques to prevent or reduce the 18            need for force whenever safe and feasible;19                (iii) specific training on the law concerning 20            stops, searches, and the use of force under the 21            Fourth Amendment to the United States 22            Constitution;23                (iv) specific training on officer safety 24            techniques, including cover, concealment, and 25            time; and26                (v) at least 6 hours of training focused on   SB3697 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1            high-risk traffic stops.2            (B) Minimum triennial in-service training 3        requirements. Minimum triennial in-service training 4        required this under subparagraph (B) includes training 5        and continuing education to Illinois State Police 6        officers concerning:7                (i) constitutional and proper use of law 8            enforcement authority;9                (ii) civil and human rights;10                (iii) cultural competency, including implicit 11            bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity; and12                (iv) procedural justice.13            (C) Mandated reporter; training. Training required 14        under this subparagraph (C) must be approved by the 15        Department of Children and Family Services as provided 16        under Section 4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 17        Reporting Act and includes training on the reporting 18        of child abuse and neglect.19            (D) Sexual assault and sexual abuse; training.20                (i) Training required under this subparagraph 21            (D) shall include in-service training on sexual 22            assault and sexual abuse response and training on 23            report writing requirements, including, but not 24            limited to, the following:25                    (a) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;26                    (b) understanding the role trauma has   SB3697 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1                played in a victim's life;2                    (c) responding to the needs and concerns 3                of a victim;4                    (d) delivering services in a 5                compassionate, sensitive, and nonjudgmental 6                manner;7                    (e) interviewing techniques in accordance 8                with the curriculum standards in subdivision 9                (iii) of this subparagraph;10                    (f) understanding cultural perceptions and 11                common myths of sexual assault and sexual 12                abuse; and13                    (g) report writing techniques in 14                accordance with the curriculum standards in 15                subdivision (iii) of this subparagraph and the 16                Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act.17                (ii) Instructors providing training under this 18            subparagraph (G) shall have successfully completed 19            training on evidence-based, trauma-informed, 20            victim-centered responses to cases of sexual 21            assault and sexual abuse and shall have experience 22            responding to sexual assault and sexual abuse 23            cases.24                (iii) The Illinois State Police shall adopt 25            rules, in consultation with the Office of the 26            Attorney General and the Illinois Law Enforcement   SB3697 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1            Training Standards Board, to determine the 2            specific training requirements. The rules adopted 3            by the Illinois State Police shall include, at a 4            minimum, both of the following:5                    (a) evidence-based curriculum standards 6                for report writing and immediate response to 7                sexual assault and sexual abuse, including 8                trauma-informed, victim-centered interview 9                techniques, which have been demonstrated to 10                minimize retraumatization, for all Illinois 11                State Police officers; and12                    (b) evidence-based curriculum standards 13                for trauma-informed, victim-centered 14                investigation and interviewing techniques, 15                which have been demonstrated to minimize 16                retraumatization, for cases of sexual assault 17                and sexual abuse for all Illinois State Police 18                officers who conduct sexual assault and sexual 19                abuse investigations.20        (4) At least every 5 years, the Division of the 21    Academy and Training shall provide the following 22    in-service training to Illinois State Police officers:23            (A) Psychology of domestic violence; training. 24        Training under this subparagraph (A) shall provide aid 25        in understanding the actions of domestic violence 26        victims and abusers and the actions needed to prevent   SB3697 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1        further victimization of those who have been abused. 2        The training shall focus specifically on looking 3        beyond physical evidence to the psychology of domestic 4        violence situations by studying the dynamics of the 5        aggressor-victim relationship, separately evaluating 6        claims where both parties claim to be the victim, and 7        assessing the long-term effects of domestic violence 8        situations.9    (c-10) Cadet training. The Division of the Academy and 10Training shall provide the following basic training to 11Illinois State Police cadets or ensure the following training 12was completed prior to an Illinois State Police cadet becoming 13an Illinois State Police officer:14        (1) Animal fighting awareness and humane response; 15    training. Training required under this paragraph (1) shall 16    include a training program in animal fighting awareness 17    and humane response for Illinois State Police cadets. The 18    purpose of that training shall be for Illinois State 19    Police officers to identify animal fighting operations and 20    respond appropriately. Training under this paragraph (1) 21    shall include a humane response component that provides 22    guidelines for appropriate law enforcement response to 23    animal abuse, cruelty, and neglect, or similar condition, 24    as well as training on canine behavior and nonlethal ways 25    to subdue a canine.26        (2) Arrest and use of force and control tactics and   SB3697 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    officer safety; training. Training required under this 2    paragraph (2) must include, without limitation, training 3    on officer safety techniques, such as cover, concealment, 4    and time.5        (3) Arrest of a parent or an immediate family member; 6    training. Training required under this paragraph (3) shall 7    instruct Illinois State Police cadets on trauma-informed 8    responses designed to ensure the physical safety and 9    well-being of a child of an arrested parent or immediate 10    family member, which must include, without limitation: (A) 11    training in understanding the trauma experienced by the 12    child while maintaining the integrity of the arrest and 13    safety of officers, suspects, and other involved 14    individuals; (B) training in de-escalation tactics that 15    would include the use of force when reasonably necessary; 16    and (C) training in understanding and inquiring whether a 17    child will require supervision and care.18        (4) Autism and other developmental or physical 19    disabilities; training. Training required under this 20    paragraph (4) shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets 21    on identifying and interacting with persons with autism 22    and other developmental or physical disabilities, reducing 23    barriers to reporting crimes against persons with autism, 24    and addressing the unique challenges presented by cases 25    involving victims or witnesses with autism and other 26    developmental disabilities.  SB3697 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1        (5) Cell phone medical information; training. Training 2    required under this paragraph (5) shall instruct Illinois 3    State Police cadets to access and use medical information 4    stored in cell phones. The Division of the Academy and 5    Training may use the program approved under Section 6    2310-711 of the Department of Public Health Powers and 7    Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to 8    develop the training required under this paragraph (5). 9        (6) Compliance with the Health Care Violence 10    Prevention Act; training. Training required under this 11    paragraph (6) shall provide an appropriate level of 12    training for Illinois State Police cadets concerning the 13    Health Care Violence Prevention Act.14        (7) Constitutional law; training. Training required 15    under this paragraph (7) shall instruct Illinois State 16    Police cadets on constitutional and proper use of law 17    enforcement authority, procedural justice, civil rights, 18    human rights, and cultural competency, including implicit 19    bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity.20        (8) Courtroom testimony; training.21        (9) Crime victims; training. Training required under 22    this paragraph (9) shall provide instruction in techniques 23    designed to promote effective communication at the initial 24    contact with crime victims and to comprehensively explain 25    to victims and witnesses their rights under the Rights of 26    Crime Victims and Witnesses Act and the Crime Victims   SB3697 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    Compensation Act.2        (10) Criminal law; training.3        (11) Crisis intervention team and mental health 4    awareness; training. Training required under this 5    paragraph (11) shall include a specialty certification 6    course of at least 40 hours, addressing specialized 7    policing responses to people with mental illnesses. The 8    Division of the Academy and Training shall conduct Crisis 9    Intervention Team training programs that train officers to 10    identify signs and symptoms of mental illness, to 11    de-escalate situations involving individuals who appear to 12    have a mental illness and connect individuals in crisis to 13    treatment.14        (12) Cultural diversity; training.15            (A) The training required under this paragraph 16        (12) shall provide training to Illinois State Police 17        cadets concerning cultural competency and cultural 18        diversity, including sensitivity toward racial and 19        ethnic differences.20            (B) This training shall include, but not be 21        limited to, an emphasis on the fact that the primary 22        purpose of enforcement of the Illinois Vehicle Code is 23        safety, equal, and uniform and non-discriminatory 24        enforcement under the law.25        (13) De-escalation and use of force; training. 26    Training required under this paragraph (13) must consist   SB3697 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    of at least 6 hours of instruction on use of force 2    techniques, including the use of de-escalation techniques 3    to prevent or reduce the need for force whenever safe and 4    feasible.5        (14) Domestic violence; training. Training required 6    under this paragraph (14) shall provide aid in 7    understanding the actions of domestic violence victims and 8    abusers and to prevent further victimization of those who 9    have been abused, focusing specifically on looking beyond 10    the physical evidence to the psychology of domestic 11    violence situations, such as the dynamics of the 12    aggressor-victim relationship, separately evaluating 13    claims where both parties claim to be the victim, and 14    long-term effects.15        (15) Effective recognition of and responses to stress, 16    trauma, and post-traumatic stress; training. Training 17    required under this paragraph (15) shall instruct Illinois 18    State Police cadets to recognize and respond to stress, 19    trauma, and post-traumatic stress experienced by law 20    enforcement officers. The training must be consistent with 21    Section 25 of the Illinois Mental Health First Aid 22    Training Act in a peer setting, including recognizing 23    signs and symptoms of work-related cumulative stress, 24    issues that may lead to suicide, and solutions for 25    intervention with peer support resources.26        (16) Elder abuse; training. Training required under   SB3697 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    this paragraph (16) shall teach Illinois State Police 2    cadets to recognize neglect and financial exploitation 3    against the elderly and adults with disabilities. The 4    training shall also teach Illinois State Police cadets to 5    recognize self-neglect by the elderly and adults with 6    disabilities. In this subparagraph, "adults with 7    disabilities" has the meaning given to that term in the 8    Adult Protective Services Act.9        (17) Electronic control devices; training. Training 10    required under this paragraph (17) shall include training 11    in the use of electronic control devices, including the 12    psychological and physiological effects of the use of 13    those devices on humans.14        (18) Epinephrine auto-injector administration; 15    training. Training required under this paragraph (18) 16    shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets to recognize 17    and respond to anaphylaxis. The training must comply with 18    subsection (c) of Section 40 of the Illinois State Police 19    Act.20        (19) Evidence collection; training. Training required 21    under this paragraph (19) must include proper procedures 22    for collecting, handling, and preserving evidence, and 23    rules of law.24        (20) Firearms restraining orders; training. Providing 25    instruction on the process used to file a firearms 26    restraining order and how to identify situations in which   SB3697 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    a firearms restraining order is appropriate and how to 2    safely promote the usage of the firearms restraining order 3    in different situations.4        (21) Firearms; training. Successful completion of a 5    40-hour course of training in use of a suitable type 6    firearm shall be a condition precedent to the possession 7    and use of that respective firearm in connection with the 8    officer's official duties. To satisfy the requirements of 9    this Act, the training must include the following:10            (A) Instruction in the dangers of misuse of the 11        firearm, safety rules, and care and cleaning of the 12        firearm.13            (B) Practice firing on a range and qualification 14        with the firearm in accordance with the standards 15        established by the Board.16            (C) Instruction in the legal use of firearms under 17        the Criminal Code of 2012 and relevant court 18        decisions.19            (D) A forceful presentation of the ethical and 20        moral considerations assumed by any person who uses a 21        firearm.22        (22) First-aid; training. First-aid training must 23    include cardiopulmonary resuscitation.24        (23) Hate crimes; training. Training required under 25    this paragraph (23) shall instruct Illinois State Police 26    cadets in identifying, responding to, and reporting all   SB3697 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    hate crimes, as defined in Section 12-7.1 of the Criminal 2    Code of 2012. The training curriculum may include material 3    to help officers distinguish hate crimes from other 4    crimes, to help officers in understanding and assisting 5    victims of hate crimes, and to ensure that hate crimes 6    will be accurately reported. The Illinois State Police 7    shall review the training curriculum biennially and may 8    consult with the Commission on Discrimination and Hate 9    Crimes to update the training curriculum as needed.10        (24) High-risk traffic stops; training. Training 11    required under this paragraph (24) must consist of at 12    least 6 hours of training focused on high-risk traffic 13    stops.14        (25) High-speed vehicle chase; training. Training 15    required under this paragraph (25) shall instruct Illinois 16    State Police cadets on the hazards of high-speed police 17    vehicle chases with an emphasis on alternatives to the 18    high-speed vehicle chase.19        (26) Human relations; training.20        (27) Human trafficking; training. Training required 21    under this paragraph (27) shall instruct Illinois State 22    Police cadets in the detection and investigation of all 23    forms of human trafficking, including, but not limited to, 24    involuntary servitude under subsection (b) of Section 10-9 25    of the Criminal Code of 2012, involuntary sexual servitude 26    of a minor under subsection (c) of Section 10-9 of the   SB3697 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    Criminal Code of 2012, and trafficking in persons under 2    subsection (d) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 3    2012. This program shall be made available to all cadets 4    and Illinois State Police officers.5        (28) Juvenile law; training. Training required under 6    this paragraph (28) shall instruct Illinois State Police 7    cadets on juvenile law and the proper processing and 8    handling of juvenile offenders.9        (29) Mandated reporter; training. Training required 10    under this paragraph (29) must be approved by the 11    Department of Children and Family Services as provided 12    under Section 4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 13    Reporting Act and includes training on the reporting of 14    child abuse and neglect.15        (30) Mental conditions and crises, training. Training 16    required under this paragraph (30) shall include, without 17    limitation, (A) recognizing the disease of addiction, (B) 18    recognizing situations which require immediate assistance, 19    and (C) responding in a manner that safeguards and 20    provides assistance to individuals in need of mental 21    treatment.22        (31) Officer wellness and suicide prevention; 23    training. The training required under this paragraph (31) 24    shall include instruction on job-related stress management 25    techniques, skills for recognizing signs and symptoms of 26    work-related cumulative stress, recognition of other   SB3697 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    issues that may lead to officer suicide, solutions for 2    intervention, and a presentation on available peer support 3    resources.4        (32) Officer-worn body cameras; training.5            (A) As used in this paragraph (32), "officer-worn 6        body camera" has the meaning given to that term in 7        Article 10 of the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body 8        Camera Act.9            (B) The training required under this paragraph 10        (32) shall provide training in the use of officer-worn 11        body cameras to cadets who will use officer-worn body 12        cameras.13        (33) Opioid antagonists; training.14            (A) As used in this paragraph (33), "opioid 15        antagonist" has the meaning given to that term in 16        subsection (e) of Section 5-23 of the Substance Use 17        Disorder Act.18            (B) Training required under this paragraph (33) 19        shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets to 20        administer opioid antagonists.21        (34) Persons arrested while under the influence of 22    alcohol or drugs; training. Training required under this 23    paragraph (34) shall comply with Illinois State Police 24    policy adopted under Section 2605-54. The training shall 25    be consistent with the Substance Use Disorder Act and 26    shall provide guidance for the arrest of persons under the   SB3697 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    influence of alcohol or drugs, proper medical attention if 2    warranted, and care and release of those persons from 3    custody. The training shall provide guidance concerning 4    the release of persons arrested under the influence of 5    alcohol or drugs who are under the age of 21 years of age, 6    which shall include, but shall not be limited to, 7    instructions requiring the arresting officer to make a 8    reasonable attempt to contact a responsible adult who is 9    willing to take custody of the person who is under the 10    influence of alcohol or drugs.11        (35) Physical training.12        (36) Post-traumatic stress disorder; training. 13    Training required under this paragraph (36) shall equip 14    Illinois State Police cadets to identify the symptoms of 15    post-traumatic stress disorder and to respond 16    appropriately to individuals exhibiting those symptoms.17        (37) Report writing; training. Training required under 18    this paragraph (37) shall instruct Illinois State Police 19    cadets on writing reports and proper documentation of 20    statements.21        (38) Scenario training. At least 12 hours of hands-on, 22    scenario-based role-playing.23        (39) Search and seizure; training. Training required 24    under this paragraph (39) shall instruct Illinois State 25    Police cadets on search and seizure, including temporary 26    questioning.  SB3697 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1        (40) Sexual assault and sexual abuse; training. 2    Training required under this paragraph (40) shall instruct 3    Illinois State Police cadets on sexual assault and sexual 4    abuse response and report writing training requirements, 5    including, but not limited to, the following:6            (A) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;7            (B) understanding the role trauma has played in a 8        victim's life;9            (C) responding to the needs and concerns of a 10        victim;11            (D) delivering services in a compassionate, 12        sensitive, and nonjudgmental manner;13            (E) interviewing techniques in accordance with the 14        curriculum standards in subsection (f) of Section 15        10.19 of the Illinois Police Training Act;16            (F) understanding cultural perceptions and common 17        myths of sexual assault and sexual abuse; and18            (G) report-writing techniques in accordance with 19        the curriculum standards in subsection (f) of Section 20        10.19 of the Illinois Police Training Act and the 21        Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act.22        (41) Traffic control and crash investigation; 23    training. 24    (d) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 25administer and conduct a program consistent with 18 U.S.C. 26926B and 926C for qualified active and retired Illinois State   SB3697 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1Police officers. 2(Source: P.A. 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 103-939, eff. 1-1-25; 3103-949, eff. 1-1-25; 104-24, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 48-15-25; revised 9-10-25.) 5    Section 10. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 6changing Section 7 and by adding Section 10.29 as follows: 7    (50 ILCS 705/7)8    Sec. 7. Rules and standards for schools. The Board shall 9adopt rules and minimum standards for such schools which shall 10include, but not be limited to, the following:11        a. The curriculum for probationary law enforcement 12    officers which shall be offered by all certified schools 13    shall include, but not be limited to, courses of 14    procedural justice, arrest and use and control tactics, 15    search and seizure, including temporary questioning, civil 16    rights, human rights, human relations, cultural 17    competency, including implicit bias and racial and ethnic 18    sensitivity, criminal law, law of criminal procedure, 19    constitutional and proper use of law enforcement 20    authority, crisis intervention training, vehicle and 21    traffic law including uniform and non-discriminatory 22    enforcement of the Illinois Vehicle Code, traffic control 23    and crash investigation, techniques of obtaining physical 24    evidence, court testimonies, statements, reports, firearms   SB3697 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    training, training in the use of electronic control 2    devices, including the psychological and physiological 3    effects of the use of those devices on humans, first aid 4    (including cardiopulmonary resuscitation), training in the 5    administration of opioid antagonists as defined in 6    paragraph (1) of subsection (e) of Section 5-23 of the 7    Substance Use Disorder Act, handling of juvenile 8    offenders, recognition of mental conditions and crises, 9    including, but not limited to, the disease of addiction, 10    which require immediate assistance and response and 11    methods to safeguard and provide assistance to a person in 12    need of mental treatment, recognition of abuse, neglect, 13    financial exploitation, and self-neglect of adults with 14    disabilities and older adults, as defined in Section 2 of 15    the Adult Protective Services Act, crimes against the 16    elderly, hate crimes and crimes motivated by bias, law of 17    evidence, the hazards of high-speed police vehicle chases 18    with an emphasis on alternatives to the high-speed chase, 19    and physical training. The curriculum shall include a 20    block of instruction addressing trauma-informed programs, 21    procedures, and practices meant to minimize traumatization 22    of the victim. The curriculum shall include specific 23    training in techniques for immediate response to and 24    investigation of cases of domestic violence and of sexual 25    assault of adults and children, including cultural 26    perceptions and common myths of sexual assault and sexual   SB3697 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    abuse as well as interview techniques that are age 2    sensitive and are trauma informed, victim centered, and 3    victim sensitive. The curriculum shall include training in 4    techniques designed to promote effective communication at 5    the initial contact with crime victims and ways to 6    comprehensively explain to victims and witnesses their 7    rights under the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act 8    and the Crime Victims Compensation Act. The curriculum 9    shall also include training in effective recognition of 10    and responses to stress, trauma, and post-traumatic stress 11    experienced by law enforcement officers that is consistent 12    with Section 25 of the Illinois Mental Health First Aid 13    Training Act in a peer setting, including recognizing 14    signs and symptoms of work-related cumulative stress, 15    issues that may lead to suicide, and solutions for 16    intervention with peer support resources. The curriculum 17    shall include a block of instruction addressing the 18    mandatory reporting requirements under the Abused and 19    Neglected Child Reporting Act. The curriculum shall also 20    include a block of instruction aimed at identifying and 21    interacting with persons with autism and other 22    developmental or physical disabilities, reducing barriers 23    to reporting crimes against persons with autism, and 24    addressing the unique challenges presented by cases 25    involving victims or witnesses with autism and other 26    developmental disabilities. The curriculum shall include   SB3697 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    training in the detection and investigation of all forms 2    of human trafficking. The curriculum shall also include 3    instruction in trauma-informed responses designed to 4    ensure the physical safety and well-being of a child of an 5    arrested parent or immediate family member; this 6    instruction must include, but is not limited to: (1) 7    understanding the trauma experienced by the child while 8    maintaining the integrity of the arrest and safety of 9    officers, suspects, and other involved individuals; (2) 10    de-escalation tactics that would include the use of force 11    when reasonably necessary; and (3) inquiring whether a 12    child will require supervision and care. The curriculum 13    for probationary law enforcement officers shall include: 14    (1) at least 12 hours of hands-on, scenario-based 15    role-playing; (2) at least 6 hours of instruction on use 16    of force techniques, including the use of de-escalation 17    techniques to prevent or reduce the need for force 18    whenever safe and feasible; (3) specific training on 19    officer safety techniques, including cover, concealment, 20    and time; and (4) at least 6 hours of training focused on 21    high-risk traffic stops. The curriculum for permanent law 22    enforcement officers shall include, but not be limited to: 23    (1) refresher and in-service training in any of the 24    courses listed above in this subparagraph, (2) advanced 25    courses in any of the subjects listed above in this 26    subparagraph, (3) training for supervisory personnel, and   SB3697 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    (4) specialized training in subjects and fields to be 2    selected by the board. The training in the use of 3    electronic control devices shall be conducted for 4    probationary law enforcement officers, including 5    University police officers. The curriculum shall also 6    include training on the use of a firearms restraining 7    order by providing instruction on the process used to file 8    a firearms restraining order and how to identify 9    situations in which a firearms restraining order is 10    appropriate.11        b. Minimum courses of study, attendance requirements 12    and equipment requirements.13        c. Minimum requirements for instructors.14        d. Minimum basic training requirements, which a 15    probationary law enforcement officer must satisfactorily 16    complete before being eligible for permanent employment as 17    a local law enforcement officer for a participating local 18    governmental or State governmental agency. Those 19    requirements shall include training in first aid 20    (including cardiopulmonary resuscitation).21        e. Minimum basic training requirements, which a 22    probationary county corrections officer must 23    satisfactorily complete before being eligible for 24    permanent employment as a county corrections officer for a 25    participating local governmental agency.26        f. Minimum basic training requirements which a   SB3697 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    probationary court security officer must satisfactorily 2    complete before being eligible for permanent employment as 3    a court security officer for a participating local 4    governmental agency. The Board shall establish those 5    training requirements which it considers appropriate for 6    court security officers and shall certify schools to 7    conduct that training. 8        A person hired to serve as a court security officer 9    must obtain from the Board a certificate (i) attesting to 10    the officer's successful completion of the training 11    course; (ii) attesting to the officer's satisfactory 12    completion of a training program of similar content and 13    number of hours that has been found acceptable by the 14    Board under the provisions of this Act; or (iii) attesting 15    to the Board's determination that the training course is 16    unnecessary because of the person's extensive prior law 17    enforcement experience.18        Individuals who currently serve as court security 19    officers shall be deemed qualified to continue to serve in 20    that capacity so long as they are certified as provided by 21    this Act within 24 months of June 1, 1997 (the effective 22    date of Public Act 89-685). Failure to be so certified, 23    absent a waiver from the Board, shall cause the officer to 24    forfeit his or her position.25        All individuals hired as court security officers on or 26    after June 1, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act   SB3697 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    89-685) shall be certified within 12 months of the date of 2    their hire, unless a waiver has been obtained by the 3    Board, or they shall forfeit their positions.4        The Sheriff's Merit Commission, if one exists, or the 5    Sheriff's Office if there is no Sheriff's Merit 6    Commission, shall maintain a list of all individuals who 7    have filed applications to become court security officers 8    and who meet the eligibility requirements established 9    under this Act. Either the Sheriff's Merit Commission, or 10    the Sheriff's Office if no Sheriff's Merit Commission 11    exists, shall establish a schedule of reasonable intervals 12    for verification of the applicants' qualifications under 13    this Act and as established by the Board.14        g. Minimum in-service training requirements, which a 15    law enforcement officer must satisfactorily complete every 16    3 years. Those requirements shall include constitutional 17    and proper use of law enforcement authority; procedural 18    justice; civil rights; human rights; reporting child abuse 19    and neglect; hate crimes and crimes motivated by bias; 20    autism-informed law enforcement responses, techniques, and 21    procedures; trauma-informed programs, procedures, and 22    practices meant to minimize traumatization of the victim; 23    and cultural competency, including implicit bias and 24    racial and ethnic sensitivity. These trainings shall 25    consist of at least 30 hours of training every 3 years.26        h. Minimum in-service training requirements, which a   SB3697 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    law enforcement officer must satisfactorily complete at 2    least annually. Those requirements shall include law 3    updates, emergency medical response training and 4    certification, crisis intervention training, and officer 5    wellness and mental health.6        i. Minimum in-service training requirements as set 7    forth in Section 10.6.8    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 9changes made to this Section by Public Act 101-652, Public Act 10102-28, and Public Act 102-694 take effect July 1, 2022. 11(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-949, eff. 1-1-25; 12104-84, eff. 1-1-26.) 13    (50 ILCS 705/10.29 new)14    Sec. 10.29. Training; crimes motivated by bias. 15    (a) The Board shall develop or approve a course to assist 16law enforcement officers in identifying, responding to, and 17reporting crimes committed in whole or in substantial part 18because of the victim's or another's actual or perceived race, 19color, ethnicity, religion, sex, gender, sexual orientation, 20gender identity, gender expression, age, national origin, or 21disability, or because of the victim's actual or perceived 22association with another person or group of a certain actual 23or perceived race, color, ethnicity, religion, sex, gender, 24sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, 25national origin, or disability.  SB3697 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 17572 RTM 31000 b1    Each course must include instruction to help officers 2distinguish bias crimes from other crimes, to help officers in 3understanding and assisting victims of these crimes, and to 4ensure that bias crimes will be accurately reported. The Board 5must, within a reasonable amount of time, update this course 6to conform with national trends and best practices.7    In updating the approved training courses described in 8this subsection, the Board may consult with and incorporate 9input from the Commission on Discrimination and Hate Crimes.10    (b) The Board is encouraged to adopt model policies to 11assist law enforcement agencies in developing policies related 12to hate crimes and crimes motivated by violence. The Board may 13consult with the Commission on Discrimination and Hate Crimes 14or other entities to develop these policies.15    (c) The Board must periodically conduct an educational 16conference to inform and sensitize chief law enforcement 17officers, community service providers, and other interested 18persons to the law enforcement issues associated with bias 19crimes. The Board may partner with other public or private 20entities to sponsor and conduct these conferences.